Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.160

Oath, form of.

The oath of office for commissioned and warrant officers in the organized militia of Washington shall be substantially as follows: "I, . . . . . ., do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the state of Washington, against all enemies, foreign or domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I will obey the orders of the president of the United States and of the governor of the state of Washington, that I make this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion, and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office of . . . . . . in the organized militia of the state of Washington upon which I am about to enter, so help me God."

[ 1943 c 130 s 30; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-30. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 27; 1909 c 134 s 37.]